Missouri, session 2026, SB1684.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1
Section A. Chapter 442, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
2
one new section, to be known as section 442.920, to read as
3
follows:
1
442.920. 1. This section shall be known and may be
2
cited as the " Mis s ouri Residential Sale Leaseback Protection
3
Act".
4
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms
5
mean:
6
(1) "Buyer", any person or entity that acquires an
7
ownershi p interest in residential real estate in a sale
8
leaseback transaction;
9
(2) "Residential real estate", real property that is
10
improved by a building or other structure that has one to
11
four dwelling units;
12
(3) "Sale leaseback", a transaction or series of
13
transact i ons in which a seller sells residential real estate
14
that is or was the seller's residence to another party and,
15
as a condition of the sale, or as part of the same or a
16
related transaction, enters into a lease or rental agreement
17
to remain in or re-occupy the property;

SB 1684 2
18
(4) "Seller", any natural person who transfers an
19
ownershi p interest in residential real estate in a sale
20
leaseback transaction.
21
3. (1) In any sale leaseback transaction, the buyer
22
shall p r ovid e the seller with the following disclosure on a
23
single page in a clear and conspicuous manner, printed in
24
boldface type:
25
If you sign a sale leaseback agreement, you
26
are entering into a contract to sell your
27
home. This means you will no longer own your
28
home.
29
You may be subject to eviction if you do not
30
follow the lease terms.
31
You may lose the right to buy back your home.
32
This may affect your credit, taxes, and legal
33
rights.
34
You are encouraged to speak with:
35
(1) An attorney;
36
(2) A real estate agent;
37
(3) A housing counselor;
38
(4) A tax advisor; and
39
(5) A real estate appraiser.
40
You have the right to cancel any sale
41
leaseback agreement, without penalty, up to
42
the date of closing. Your cancellation must
43
be made in writing, NOT by phone call.
44
No sale leaseback can be closed for at least
45
thirty (30) days after signing an agreement.

SB 1684 3
46
If you cancel an agreement, all payments of
47
any kind made by either party shall be
48
refunded.
49
Do not sign unless you fully understand the
50
terms.
51
(2) The disclosure required by subdivision (1) of this
52
subsecti o n shall be provided to the seller not more than ten
53
days and not less than three business days before the
54
execution of any sale leaseback agreement, and the
55
disclosures shall be signed by both the seller and the buyer
56
concurrently with the execution of the sale leaseback
57
agreement.
58
(3) A copy of the signed disclosure required by
59
subdivis i on (1) of this subsection shall be provided to the
60
seller within five days of the execution of the sale
61
leaseback agreement.
62
4. There shall be no delivery, recording, or other
63
transfe r of title from seller to buyer until thirty days
64
after the execution of any sale leaseback agreement.
65
5. (1) A seller who is party to a sale leaseback
66
agreeme n t sh a ll have the right to cancel any such agreement
67
prior to the transfer of title, but in no event earlier than
68
thirty days after execution of the sale leaseback agreement,
69
without penalty.
70
(2) Notice of cancellation shall be given in writing
71
by selle r to buyer.
72
(3) Within ten business days after the receipt of a
73
notice o f cancellation, all payments of any kind made by
74
either party shall be refunded and an acknowledgment that
75
the sale leaseback agreement is void shall be sent by buyer
76
to seller.

SB 1684 4
77
(4) A seller who exercises the right of cancellation
78
shall no t be liable for any damages as a result of the
79
exercise of that right.
80
6. (1) Any violation of the provisions of this
81
section shal l be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed
82
ten thousand dollars per violation.
83
(2) The attorney general may bring an action to
84
enforce t his section, including actions for injunctive
85
relief, civil penalties, and restitution.
86
(3) Any seller harmed by a violation of this section
87
may brin g a civil action to recover:
88
(a) Actual damages;
89
(b) Statutory damages of ten thousand dollars, which
90
shall be in addition to any actual damages proven;
91
(c) Attorneys' fees and costs; and
92
(d) Equitable or injunctive relief.
93
7. N o provision of this section shall be modified or
94
waived b y any agreement. Any portion of an agreement that
95
is executed, modified, or extended after the effective date
96
of this section that modifies or waives a duty or remedy
97
under this section is void ab initio and unenforceable.
